Hawaii statutes.
§333F-17.5 Disposition of Title XIX
funds. All earned Title XIX funds collected for community program services
under this chapter shall be deposited to the credit of the state general fund.
[L 1990, c 96, §1; am L 1993, c 280, §39]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next